test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-lex_kalgad_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config: 
  hfst: 
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox: 
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests: 


  Verb - kalgâđ: #
    kalgâđ+V+Inf: kalgâđ
    kalgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kaalgâm
    kalgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: kaalgah
    kalgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kálgá
    kalgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: kälgeen
    kalgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: kalgâvettee
    kalgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: kalgâv
    kalgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: kalgâp
    kalgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: kalgâvetteđ
    kalgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: kälgih
    kalgâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: kalgim
    kalgâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: kalgih
    kalgâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: kaalgâi
    kalgâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: kalgáim
    kalgâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: kalgáid
    kalgâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: kalgáin
    kalgâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: kaalgâim
    kalgâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: kaalgâid
    kalgâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: kalgii
    kalgâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: kalgâččim
    kalgâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: kalgâččih
    kalgâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: kalgâččij
    kalgâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: kalgâččáim
    kalgâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: kalgâččáid
    kalgâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: kalgâččáin
    kalgâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: kalgâččijm
    kalgâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: kalgâččijd
    kalgâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: kalgâččii
    kalgâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: kälgeem
    kalgâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: kälgeeh
    kalgâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: kaalgâš
    kalgâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: kalgâžeen
    kalgâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: kaalgâšvettee
    kalgâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: kalgâžává
    kalgâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: kalgâžep
    kalgâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: kaalgâšvetteđ
    kalgâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: kalgâžeh
    kalgâđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: kaalgâ
    kalgâđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: káálgus
    kalgâđ+V+Imprt+Du1: kálgoon
    kalgâđ+V+Imprt+Du2: kälgee
    kalgâđ+V+Imprt+Du3: kálgus
    kalgâđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: kálgup
    kalgâđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: kalgâđ
    kalgâđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: kálgus
    kalgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: kaalgâ
    kalgâđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: kalgâm
    kalgâđ+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: kalgâččii
    kalgâđ+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: kalgii
    kalgâđ+V+Imprt+ConNeg: kaalgâ
    kalgâđ+V+PrsPrc: kälgee
    kalgâđ+V+PrfPrc: kalgâm
    kalgâđ+V+Actio+Nom: kalgâm
    kalgâđ+V+Actio+Ess: kalgâmin
    kalgâđ+V+Actio+Loc: kalgâmist
    kalgâđ+V+Actio+Ill: kalgâmân
    kalgâđ+V+Actio+Com: kalgâdijn
    kalgâđ+V+VAbess: kalgâhánnáá
